ja: ハンドウェア素材: アクリル; バンブー; コットン; エラストマー; エチレン酢酸ビニルアセテート (EVA); フェイクファー; フェイクレザー; フリース; Kevlar; ラテックス; レザー; メッシュ; マイクロファイバー; ネオプレン; ニトリル; ナイロン; ポリエステル; ポリエチレン (PE); ポリウレタン (PU); ポリ塩化ビニル (PVC); サテン; シルク; スパンデックス; 合成品; ウール; その他
de: Handschuhmaterial: Acryl; Bambus; Baumwolle; Elastomer; Ethylen-Vinylacetat (EVA); Kunstpelz; Kunstleder; Vlies; Kevlar; Latex; Leder; Netz; Mikrofaser; Neopren; Nitril; Nylon; Polyester; Polyethylen (PE); Polyurethan (PU); Polyvinylchlorid (PVC); Seidenmatt; Seide; Elasthan; Synthetisch; Wolle; Sonstiges
sk-SK: Materiál rukavíc: Akryl; Bambus; Bavlna; Elastomér; Etylénvinylacetát (EVA); Umelá kožušina; Umelá koža; Flís; Kevlar; Latex; Koža; Sieťovina; Mikrovlákno; Neoprén; Nitril; Nylon; Polyester; Polyetylén (PE); Polyuretán (PU); Polyvinylchlorid (PVC); Satén; Hodváb; Elastan; Syntetický; Vlna; Iné
nl: Materaal handmode: Acryl; Bamboe; Katoen; Elastomeer; Ethyleen-vinylacetaat (EVA); Nepbont; Kunstleer; Fleece; Kevlar; Latex; Leer; Gaas; Microvezel; Neopreen; Nitril; Nylon; Polyester; Polyethyleen (PE); Polyurethaan (PU); Polyvinylchloride (PVC); Satijn; Zijde; Spandex; Synthetisch; Wol; Andere
bg-BG: Материал на облеклото за ръце: Акрил; Бамбук; Памук; Еластомер; Етиленвинилацетат (EVA); Изкуствена козина; Изкуствена кожа; Полар; Кевлар; Латекс; Кожа; Мрежа; Микрофибър; Неопрен; Нитрил; Найлон; Полиестер; Полиетилен (PE); Полиуретан (PU); Поливинилхлорид (PVC); Сатен; Коприна; Спандекс; Синтетичен; Вълна; Други
lt-LT: Pirštinių medžiaga: Akrilas; Bambukas; Medvilnė; Elastomeras; Etileno vinilo acetatas (EVA); Dirbtinis kailis; Dirbtinė oda; Flisas; Kevlaras; Lateksas; Oda; Tinklelis; Mikropluoštas; Neoprenas; Nitrilas; Nailonas; Poliesteris; Polietilenas (PE); Poliuretanas (PU); Polivinilchloridas (PVC); Satinas; Šilkas; Elastanas; Sintetika; Vilna; Kita
el: Υλικό γαντιών: Ακρυλικό; Μπαμπού; Βαμβάκι; Ελαστομερές; Πολυμερές αιθυλενίου και οξικού βινυλίου (EVA); Συνθετική γούνα; Συνθετικό δέρμα; Φλις; Kevlar; Λάτεξ; Δέρμα; Πλέγμα; Μικροΐνες; Νεοπρένιο; Νιτρίλιο; Νάιλον; Πολυεστέρας; Πολυαιθυλένιο (PE); Πολυουρεθάνη (PU); Πολυβινυλοχλωρίδιο (PVC); Σατέν; Μετάξι; Σπαντέξ; Συνθετικό; Μαλλί; Άλλο
vi: Vật liệu găng tay: Acrylic; Tre; Vải bông; Chất đàn hồi; Ethylene vinyl acetate (EVA); Lông thú giả; Da giả; Nỉ cào; Kevlar; Mủ cao su; Da; Lưới; Vải xơ vi mảnh; Neoprene; Nitrile; Nylon; Polyester; Polyethylene (PE); Polyurethane (PU); Polyvinyl chloride (PVC); Satin; Lụa; Vải Spandex; Tổng hợp; Len; Khác
fi: Käsivaatteiden materiaali: Akryyli; Bambu; Puuvilla; Elastomeeri; Eteenivinyyliasetaatti (EVA); Tekoturkis; Keinonahka; Fleece; Kevlar; Lateksi; Nahka; Verkko; Mikrokuitu; Neopreeni; Nitriili; Nailon; Polyesteri; Polyeteeni (PE); Polyuretaani (PU); Polyvinyylikloridi (PVC); Satiini; Silkki; Spandex; Synteettinen; Villa; Muu
cs: Materiál rukavic: Akrylové; Bambus; Bavlna; Elastomer; Ethylen vinylacetát (EVA); Nepravá kožešina; Nepravá kůže; Flís; Kevlar; Latex; Kůže; Síťovina; Mikrovlákno; Neoprén; Nitril; Nylon; Polyester; Polyethylen (PE); Polyuretan (PU); Polyvinylchlorid (PVC); Satén; Hedvábí; Spandex; Syntetické; Vlna; Jiné
it: Materiale per la manifattura: Acrilico; Bamboo; Cotone; Elastomero; Etilene acetato di vinile (EVA); Pelliccia ecologica; Ecopelle; Felpa; Kevlar; Lattice; Pelle; Mesh; Microfibra; Neoprene; Nitrile; Nylon; Poliestere; Polietilene (PE); Poliuretano (PU); Cloruro di polivinile (PVC); Satinato; Seta; Spandex; Sintetico; Lana; Altro
tr: El giysisi malzemesi: Akrilik; Bambu; Pamuk; Elastomer; Etilen vinil asetat (EVA); Sahte kürk; Suni deri; Yapağı; Kevlar; Lateks; Deri; Ağ; Mikrofiber; Neopren; Nitril; Plastik; Poliyester; Polietilen (PE); Poliüretan (PU); Polivinil klorür (PVC); Saten; İpek; Spandeks; Sentetik; Yünlüler; Diğer
hu: Kézi viselet anyaga: Akril; Bambusz; Pamut; Elasztomer; Etilén-vinil-acetát (EVA); Műszőrme; Műbőr; Gyapjú; Kevlár; Latex; Bőr; Háló; Mikroszálas; Neoprén; Nitril; Nejlon; Poliészter; Polietilén (PE); Poliuretán (PU); Polivinil-klorid (PVC); Szatén; Selyem; Spandex; Szintetikus; Gyapjú; Egyéb
hr-HR: Materijal rukavica: Akril; Bambus; Pamuk; Elastomer; Etilen vinil acetat (EVA); Umjetno krzno; Umjetna koža; Flis; Kevlar; Lateks; Koža; Mrežica; Mikrovlakna; Neopren; Nitril; Najlon; Poliester; Polietilen (PE); Poliuretan (PU); Polivinil klorid (PVC); Saten; Svila; Elastan; Sintetika; Vuna; Ostalo
ro-RO: Material articole pentru mâini: Acrilic; Bamboo; Bumbac; Elastomer; Etilen acetat de vinil (EVA); Blană artificială; Imitație de piele; Polar; Kevlar; Latex; Piele; Plasă; Microfiber; Neopren; Nitril; Nailon; Poliester; Polietilenă (PE); Poliuretan (PU); Clorură de polivinil (PVC); Satin; Mătase; Spandex; Sintetic; Lână; Altele
es: Material de las prendas de manos: Acrílico; Bambú; Algodón; Elastómero; Acetato de etileno y vinilo (EVA); Piel sintética; Cuero sintético; Vellón; Kevlar; Látex; Cuero; Malla; Microfibra; Neopreno; Nitrilo; Nylon; Poliéster; Polietileno (PE); Poliuretano (PU); Cloruro de polivinilo (PVC); Satinado; Seda; Spandex; Sintético; Lana; Otros
th: วัสดุที่ใช้ทำเครื่องสวมมือ: อะคริลิก; ไผ่; สำลี; อีลาสโตเมอร์; อีทิลีนไวนิลอะซิเตต (EVA); ขนเทียม; หนังเทียม; ผ้าขนแกะ; Kevlar; ยางพารา; หนัง; ตาข่าย; ไมโครไฟเบอร์; นีโอพรีน; ไนไตรล์; ไนลอน; โพลีเอสเตอร์; โพลิเอทิลีน (PE); โพลิยูรีเทน (PU); โพลิไวนิลคลอไรด์ (PVC); กระดาษเนื้อซาติน; ผ้าไหม; สแปนเด็กซ์; สังเคราะห์; ผ้าขนสัตว์; อื่นๆ
ru: Материал перчаток или варежек: Акрил; Бамбук; Хлопок; Эластомер; Этиленвинилацетат (ЭВА); Искусственный мех; Искусственная кожа; Флис; Кевлар; Латекс; Кожа; Сетка; Микрофибра; Неопрен; Нитрил; Нейлон; Полиэстер; Полиэтилен (ПЭ); Полиуретан (ПУ); Поливинилхлорид (ПВХ); Сатин; Шелк; Спандекс; Синтетика; Шерсть; Другое
nb: Håndklesmateriale: Akryl; Bambus; Bomull; Elastomer; Etylenvinylacetat (EVA); Fuskepels; Kunstig lær; Fleece; Kevlar; Lateks; Skinn; Mesh; Mikrofiber; Neopren; Nitril; Nylon; Polyester; Polyetylen (PE); Polyuretan (PU); Polyvinylklorid (PVC); Sateng; Silke; Spandex; Syntetisk; Ull; Annen
fr: Matériau des gants: Acrylique; Bambou; Coton; Élastomère; Éthylène-acétate de vinyle (EVA); Fausse fourrure; Faux cuir; Polaire; Kevlar; Latex; Cuir; A mailles; Microfibre; Néoprène; Nitrile; Nylon; Polyester; Polyéthylène (PE); Polyuréthane (PU); Chlorure de polyvinyle (PVC); Satiné; Soie; Spandex; Synthétique; Laine; Autre
en: Handwear material: Acrylic; Bamboo; Cotton; Elastomer; Ethylene vinyl acetate (EVA); Faux fur; Faux leather; Fleece; Kevlar; Latex; Leather; Mesh; Microfiber; Neoprene; Nitrile; Nylon; Polyester; Polyethylene (PE); Polyurethane (PU); Polyvinyl chloride (PVC); Satin; Silk; Spandex; Synthetic; Wool; Other
zh-CN: 手套材质: 丙烯酸; 竹子; 棉布; 弹性体; 乙烯醋酸乙烯酯 (EVA); 人造毛皮; 人造皮革; 羊毛; Kevlar; 乳胶; 皮革; 网状; 超细纤维; 氯丁橡胶; 丁腈; 尼龙; 聚酯纤维; 聚乙烯 (PE); 聚氨酯 (PU); 聚氯乙烯 (PVC); 缎; 丝绸; 氨纶; 合成; 羊毛; 其他
pt-BR: Material de luvas: Acrílico; Bambu; Algodão; Elastômero; Etileno acetato de vinila (EVA); Pele sintetica; Couro falso; Lã; Kevlar; Látex; Couro; Malha; Microfibra; Neoprene; Nitrila; Nylon; Poliéster; Polietileno (PE); Poliuretano (PU); Cloreto de polivinila (PVC); Cetim; Seda; Spandex; Sintético; Lã; Outro
pl: Materiał odzieży na ręce: Akryl; Bambus; Bawełna; Elastomery; Polietylen-co-oktan winylu (EVA); Sztuczne futro; Skaj; Polar; Kevlar; Lateks; Skórzane; Siatka; Mikrofibra; Neopren; Nitryl; Nylon; Poliester; Polietylen (PE); Poliuretan (PU); Polichlorek winylu (PVC); Satyna; Jedwab; Spandex; Syntetyczne; Wełna; Pozostałe
sv: Handskar - material: Akryl; Bambu; Bomull; Elastomer; Etenvinylacetat (EVA); Fuskpäls; Fuskläder; Fleece; Kevlar; Latex; Läder; Mesh; Mikrofiber; Neopren; Nitril; Nylon; Polyester; Polyeten (PE); Polyuretan (PU); Polyvinylklorid (PVC); Satin; Silke; Spandex; Syntetisk; Ylle; Annat
ko: 핸드웨어 소재: 아크릴; 대나무; 면; 엘라스토머; 에틸렌 비닐 아세테이트(EVA); 인조 모피; 인조 가죽; 플리스; Kevlar; 라텍스; 가죽; 메쉬; 극세사; 네오프렌; 니트릴; 나일론; 폴리에스테르; 폴리에틸렌(PE); 폴리우레탄(PU); 폴리염화비닐(PVC); 새틴; 실크; 스판덱스; 인조; 울; 기타
sl-SI: Material rokavic: Akril; Bambus; Bombaž; Elastomer; Etilen vinil acetat (EVA); Umetno krzno; Umetno usnje; Flis; Kevlar; Latex; Usnje; Mreža; Mikrovlakna; Neopren; Nitril; Najlon; Poliester; Polietilen (PE); Poliuretan (PU); Polivinilklorid (PVC); Saten; Svila; Spandex; Sintetika; Volna; Drugo
zh-TW: 手飾材質: 壓克力; 竹子; 棉布; 彈性體; 乙烯醋酸乙烯酯共聚物; 人造毛皮; 人造皮; 刷毛布; Kevlar; 乳膠; 皮製; 網布; 超細纖維; 氯丁橡膠; 丁腈橡膠; 尼龍; 聚酯; 聚乙烯 (PE); 聚氨酯 (PU); 聚氯乙烯 (PVC); 緞面布; 絲綢; 氨綸; 合成; 羊毛; 其他
pt-PT: Material para luvas: Acrílico; Bambu; Algodão; Elastómero; Etileno acetato de vinilo (EVA); Peles sintéticas; Couro falso; Velo; Kevlar; Látex; Pele; Rede; Microfibra; Neoprene; Nitrila; Náilon; Poliéster; Polietileno (PE); Poliuretano (PU); Cloruro de polivinilo (PVC); Acetinado; Seda; Elastano; Sintético; Lã; Outro
da: Handskemateriale: Akryl; Bambus; Bomuld; Elastomer; Ethylen-vinylacetat (EVA); Kunstskind; Kunstigt læder; Fleece; Kevlar; Latex; Læder; Mesh; Mikrofiber; Neopren; Nitril; Nylon; Polyester; Polyethylen (PE); Polyurethan (PU); Polyvinylklorid (PVC); Satin; Silke; Spandex; Syntetisk; Uld; Andet